South Dakota, session 2026, HB1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
Terms used in section 2 of this Act mean:
(1) "Children's programming," any content designed or suitable for individuals under
the age of fourteen, which is rated, or meets a rating equivalent to the following:
(a) TV-Y, TV-Y7, TV-G, or TV-PG, as set forth by the TV Parental Guidelines
Monitoring Board; or
(b) G or PG, as set forth by the Motion Picture Association; and
(2) "Video streaming service," an entity that makes either of the following available
directly to the consumer through a distribution method utilizing internet protocol:
(a) Video programming considered comparable to programming provided by a
television broadcast station; or
(b) Video content the service makes available for users to view.
The term does not include a television broadcast station, cable operator, satellite
television operator or its affiliates, or other multichannel video programming
distributor, or an entity that serves video programming or video content without
commercial advertisements.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
A video streaming service may not transmit during any children's programming
any commercial advertisement that discusses, promotes, or contains imagery related to:
(1) Abortion;
(2) Alcohol;
(3) Drugs or pharmaceutical products;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.421.10 2 1116
(4) Gambling;
(5) Gender transition; or
(6) Nicotine products.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
The attorney general may impose a civil penalty against a video streaming service
for violating section 2 of this Act. The amount of the civil penalty may not exceed five
thousand dollars. The attorney general shall forward any civil penalty collected under this
section to the state treasurer, for deposit in the general fund.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.